Louisiana, session 2026, HB208.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:1221.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1221.3. St. Helena Parish governing authority; term limits; local option election
A. At the statewide election to be held on November 3, 2026, a proposition
shall appear on the ballot in St. Helena Parish to determine whether the members of
the governing authority of St. Helena Parish shall have term limits.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-571 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 208
B. The ballot for the election shall state as follows:
"LOCAL OPTION ELECTION
Shall the number of terms of office that any member of the St. Helena
Parish governing authority may serve be limited to three consecutive four-
year terms?"
C. If the question of such term limitation is approved by a majority of the
qualified electors voting on the proposition in the parish, then each member of the
governing authority who at the end of a term of office on the governing authority
will have served as a member of the governing authority for more than two and one-
half terms in three consecutive terms, such service being during terms that began on
or after January 10, 2028, shall not be elected to the governing authority for the
succeeding term. If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the proposition in
the parish vote against such proposition, then no such term limitation shall apply.
D. The secretary of state shall prepare the ballot for the election.
E. Except as otherwise provided, the election required pursuant to this
Section shall be conducted in accordance with the Louisiana Election Code.
F. Notwithstanding Chapter 8-A of the Louisiana Election Code, the costs
of the election required pursuant to this Section shall be borne by the state.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.